Maine, session 132, LD965.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA c. 375, sub-c. 2-B is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 2-B
AUTOMATIC REPEAL OF RULES
§8091. Automatic repeal of rules and amendments to rules
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of this section
apply to any rule that is adopted or amended by any agency in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter.
1. Automatic repeal. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an agency rule
that, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, is finally adopted or an
amendment to which is finally adopted:
A. After January 1, 2026 is automatically repealed 5 years from the date of adoption;
and
B. On or before January 1, 2026 is automatically repealed on January 1, 2030.
2. Notice of repeal. The Secretary of State shall provide to the agency that adopted
or has jurisdiction over each rule a notice regarding the date of the automatic repeal of the
rule as set forth in subsection 1, including for any rule renewed by the Legislature prior to
repeal pursuant to subsection 3 or 4 or automatically renewed pursuant to subsection 5, no
later than 18 months prior to the date on which the rule is automatically repealed.
3. Agency request for renewal of rule prior to repeal. In accordance with this
subsection, an agency that has adopted or has jurisdiction over a rule may submit to the
Legislature a request that the rule be renewed and not subject to repeal for an additional
period of up to 5 years.
A. The request must describe the basis for renewing the rule and include a cost-benefit
analysis of the rule. The agency shall submit the request not earlier than 2 years and
not later than one year prior to the date on which the rule is automatically repealed in
accordance with this section and shall publish the request on its publicly accessible
website at the time the request is submitted.
B. A request determined by the Legislature to be properly submitted under this
subsection must be reviewed by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over the subject matter of the rule during the legislative session to which
the request is submitted or during the next legislative session if the request is submitted
while the Legislature is not in session. If the rule to be reviewed is a major substantive
rule as defined in subchapter 2-A, the committee shall apply in its review the criteria
set forth in section 8072, subsection 4. Following its review, the committee shall
submit to the Legislature any findings and recommendations regarding the request for
renewal and may report out legislation necessary to renew the rule for an additional
period of up to 5 years.
4. Regular review of agency rules by legislative committee. Each joint standing
committee of the Legislature shall establish an agency rule review schedule, which must
Page 1 - 132LR2103(01)

411 facilitate the committee’s review of each adopted agency rule within the committee’s
422 subject matter jurisdiction prior to the date on which the rule is automatically repealed in
433 accordance with this section. If the rule to be reviewed is a major substantive rule as
444 defined in subchapter 2-A, the committee shall apply in its review the criteria set forth in
455 section 8072, subsection 4. Following its review of each rule, the committee shall submit
466 to the Legislature any findings and recommendations regarding whether the rule should be
477 renewed and may report out legislation necessary to renew the rule for an additional period
488 of up to 5 years.
5. Automatic renewal of agency rules. If an agency's rule is renewed by the
Legislature pursuant to subsection 3 or 4, prior to the date on which the rule is automatically
repealed, the agency may elect to submit to the Legislature a request that the rule be
automatically renewed for a period of 5 additional years subsequent to the running of the
renewal period provided for by the Legislature.
A. A request for automatic renewal under this subsection must include identification
by the agency of 2 additional rules adopted by the agency that the agency will not seek
renewal of prior to automatic repeal pursuant to this section. If the agency requests
automatic renewal of a rule that is a major substantive rule as defined in subchapter
2-A, the 2 additional rules for which the agency will not seek renewal prior to automatic
repeal must also be major substantive rules.
B. A request determined by the Legislature to be properly submitted under this
subsection must be reviewed by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over the subject matter of the rule for which automatic renewal is requested
during the legislative session to which the request is submitted or during the next
legislative session if the request is submitted while the Legislature is not in session.
Following its review, the committee shall submit to the Legislature any findings and
recommendations regarding the request for automatic renewal and may report out
legislation necessary to approve automatic renewal of the rule for an additional period
of up to 5 years contingent upon the agency not seeking renewal of the 2 additional
rules it identified in the request pursuant to paragraph A.
6. Additional requirements for rules adopted after January 1, 2026. In addition
to the other requirements of this section, an agency rule that, in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter, is finally adopted after January 1, 2026 must, at the time the
agency finally adopts the rule, include a statement identifying 2 existing rules adopted by
or under the jurisdiction of the agency that the agency will not seek renewal of prior to the
automatic repeal of those rules pursuant to this section. If the agency is finally adopting a
rule that is a major substantive rule as defined in subchapter 2-A, the 2 additional rules for
which the agency will not seek renewal of prior to automatic repeal must also be major
substantive rules. For any rule that an agency identifies pursuant to this subsection as a
rule that the agency will not seek renewal of prior to its automatic repeal, the Legislature
may not consider renewal of that rule pursuant to subsection 3 or 4 prior to its automatic
repeal under this section.